Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 6. General Provisions.

Sec. 13.27.490.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“adult” means an individual who has reached 18 years of age;

“conservator” means a person appointed by the court to administer the property of an adult, including a person appointed under AS

13.26.401

;

“guardian” means a person appointed by the court to make decisions regarding the person of an adult, including a person appointed under AS

13.26.266

; however, if the person was appointed as a full guardian under AS 13.26, the person has the powers and duties set out under AS

13.26.316

;

“guardianship order” means an order appointing a guardian;

“guardianship proceeding” means a judicial proceeding in which an order for the appointment of a guardian is sought or has been issued;

“incapacitated person” means an adult for whom a guardian has been appointed;

“party” means the respondent, petitioner, guardian, conservator, or any other interested person allowed by the court to participate in a guardianship or protective proceeding;

“person” means, except in the terms incapacitated person or protected person, an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity;

“protected person” means an adult for whom a protective order has been issued;

“protective order” means an order appointing a conservator or other court order related to management of an adult’s property;

“protective proceeding” means a judicial proceeding in which a protective order is sought or has been issued;

“record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;

“respondent” means an adult for whom a protective order or the appointment of a guardian is sought;

“state” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

History.

(§ 29 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2016, in paragraphs (2) and (3) cross references to renumbered sections were conformed.

Sec. 13.27.495.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.

History.

(§ 29 ch 53 SLA 2008)